Arkansas, session 2025, HB1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Momnibus Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-151 is repealed to be reenacted and
transferred to another subchapter of the Arkansas Code.
20-77-151. Depression screening for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for depression
screening of a pregnant woman.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 29 — Maternal Health

*JMB273*
02-04-2025 10:00:09 JMB273

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1269
20-77-2901. Depression screening for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for depression
screening of a pregnant woman.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

20-77-2902. Coverage of prenatal, delivery, and postpartum services.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for prenatal,
delivery, and postpartum services separately in lieu of a global payment or
an all-inclusive payment methodology for maternity services.
(b) Prenatal, delivery, and postpartum services include without
limitation:
(1) Laboratory fees;
(2) Physician ordered testing;
(3) Blood work;
(4) Remote monitoring;
(5) Fetal nonstress tests; and
(6) Continuous glucose monitors or other services for
gestational diabetes.
(c) This section does not alter coverage provided through the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Program or a risk-based provider organization
under the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-2701 et seq.

20-77-2903. Extension of one year for postpartum coverage.
The Department of Human Services shall:
(1)(A) Extend postpartum Medicaid coverage for mothers to one
(1) year in duration.
(B) If a mother is eligible to be enrolled under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., the
extended postpartum Medicaid coverage shall be delivered as provided under
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.
(C) If a mother is not eligible to be enrolled under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., the
extended postpartum Medicaid coverage shall be delivered through the
traditional Arkansas Medicaid Program; and
02-04-2025 10:00:09 JMB273

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1269
(2) Take necessary action, including without limitation
submitting and applying for a state plan amendment or waiver, to obtain
federal approval to adopt one-year postpartum Medicaid coverage for a mother
who has recently given birth.

20-77-2904. Presumptive eligibility for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall make presumptive eligibility
determinations for pregnant women who are applying for the program to improve
access to prenatal care and allow prenatal care to be delivered immediately
while waiting for a full application to be processed.
(b) The program may designate one (1) or more qualified entities to
screen for eligibility and immediately enroll pregnant women into the
program.

20-77-2905. Blood pressure monitoring for pregnant and postpartum
women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall provide coverage and
reimbursement for self-measurement blood pressure monitoring services for
pregnant women and postpartum women.
(b) Self-measurement blood pressure monitoring services shall include:
(1) Validated blood pressure monitoring devices, such as a blood
pressure cuff and replacement cuffs, as necessary, to diagnose or treat
hypertension;
(2) Patient education and training on the set-up and use of a
self-measurement blood pressure measurement device that is validated for
clinical accuracy, device calibration, and the procedure for obtaining self-
measurement readings; and
(3) Collection of data reports by the patient or caregiver for
submission to a healthcare provider to communicate blood pressure readings
and create or modify treatment plans.

20-77-2906. Reimbursement for remote ultrasound procedures.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for remote
ultrasound procedures utilizing established Current Procedural Terminology
codes for remote ultrasound procedures when the patient is in a residence or
other off-site location from the healthcare provider of the patient and the
02-04-2025 10:00:09 JMB273

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1269
same standard of care is met.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall apply to the fee-
for-service categories of the program and any managed care plan within the
program.
(b) A remote ultrasound procedure shall be reimbursable when the
healthcare provider uses digital technology that:
(1) Collects medical and other forms of health data from a
patient and electronically transmits the information securely to a healthcare
provider in a different location for interpretation and recommendation;
(2) Is compliant with the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025; and
(3) Is approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.

20-77-2907. Coverage for certain services provided by doulas and
community health workers.
The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse doulas and community
health workers for:
(1) Home visitation related to postpartum care; and
(2) Lactation and breastfeeding services.

20-77-2908. Implementation and rules.
The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Apply for any federal waiver, Medicaid state plan
amendments, or other authority necessary to implement this subchapter; and
(2) Adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 15, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-15-318. Temporary special certificate during and after pregnancy.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Hayley
Sission Act".
(b) A woman who is pregnant, as determined by a licensed physician,
may apply to the Office of Motor Vehicle for a temporary person-with-a-
disability special certificate.
02-04-2025 10:00:09 JMB273

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1269
(c) The temporary special certificate under subsection (b) of this
section shall:
(1) Conform to the requirements under § 27-15-304; and
(2) Expire one (1) year following the date the pregnant woman
gives birth.
/s/Pilkington






























02-04-2025 10:00:09 JMB273